Maryland, session 2026, HB1408.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1408*

HOUSE BILL 1408
25–103.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “AUTOMATED TRAFFIC ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM”
MEANS:
(1) A TRAFFIC CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM UNDER §
21–202.1 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(2) AN AUTOMATED RAILROAD GRADE CROSSING ENFORCEMENT
SYSTEM UNDER § 21–704.1 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(3) A SCHOOL BUS MONITORING CAMERA UNDER § 21–706.1 OF THIS
ARTICLE;
(4) A STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEM UNDER § 21–707.1 OF THIS
ARTICLE;
(5) A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM UNDER § 21–809 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(6) A WORK ZONE SPEED CONTROL SYSTEM UNDER § 21–810 OF THIS
ARTICLE;
(7) A BUS LANE MONITORING SYSTEM UNDER § 21–1134 OF THIS
ARTICLE;
(8) A NOISE ABATEMENT MONITORING SYSTEM UNDER § 22–612 OF
THIS ARTICLE;
(9) A VEHICLE HEIGHT MONITORING SYSTEM UNDER § 24–111.3 OF
THIS ARTICLE; AND
(10) ANY OTHER AUTOMATED TRAFFIC ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM
AUTHORIZED UNDER STATE LAW.
(B) (1) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY MAY IMPOUND A MOTOR VEHICLE
FOR WHICH THREE OR MORE CITATIONS FROM AN AUTOMATED TRAFFIC
ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM HAVE BEEN ISSUED IF THE CITATIONS ARE UNPAID AND
OVERDUE BY AT LEAST 30 DAYS.
(2) A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY MAY IMPOUND A MOTOR VEHICLE
UNDER THIS SECTION ONLY:

HOUSE BILL 1408 3
(I) AS A SECONDARY ACTION WHEN A LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICER DETAINS THE DRIVER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE FOR A SUSPECTED
VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE CODE; OR
(II) WHEN THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS PARKED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Transportation
25–103.
(a) In this section, “automated traffic enforcement system” means:
(1) A traffic control signal monitoring system under § 21–202.1 of this
article;
(2) An automated railroad grade crossing enforcement system under §
21–704.1 of this article;
(3) A school bus monitoring camera under § 21–706.1 of this article;
(4) A stop sign monitoring system under § 21–707.1 of this article;
(5) A speed monitoring system under § 21–809 of this article;
(6) A work zone speed control system under § 21–810 of this article;
(7) A bus lane monitoring system under § 21–1134 of this article;
(8) [A noise abatement monitoring system under § 22–612 of this article;
(9)] A vehicle height monitoring system under § 24–111.3 of this article; and
[(10)] (9) Any other automated traffic enforcement system authorized
under State law.
(b) (1) A law enforcement agency may impound a motor vehicle for which three
or more citations from an automated traffic enforcement system have been issued if the
citations are unpaid and overdue by at least 30 days.
(2) A law enforcement agency may impound a motor vehicle under this
section only:
(i) As a secondary action when a law enforcement officer detains the

HOUSE BILL 1408
driver of the motor vehicle for a suspected violation of another provision of the Code; or
(ii) When the motor vehicle is parked.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Transportation
25–103.
(a) In this section, “automated traffic enforcement system” means:
(1) A traffic control signal monitoring system under § 21–202.1 of this
article;
(2) An automated railroad grade crossing enforcement system under §
21–704.1 of this article;
(3) A school bus monitoring camera under § 21–706.1 of this article;
(4) [A stop sign monitoring system under § 21–707.1 of this article;
(5)] A speed monitoring system under § 21–809 of this article;
[(6)] (5) A work zone speed control system under § 21–810 of this article;
[(7)] (6) A bus lane monitoring system under § 21–1134 of this article;
[(8)] (7) A noise abatement monitoring system under § 22–612 of this
article;
[(9)] (8) A vehicle height monitoring system under § 24–111.3 of this
article; and
[(10)] (9) Any other automated traffic enforcement system authorized
under State law.
(b) (1) A law enforcement agency may impound a motor vehicle for which three
or more citations from an automated traffic enforcement system have been issued if the
citations are unpaid and overdue by at least 30 days.
(2) A law enforcement agency may impound a motor vehicle under this
section only:

HOUSE BILL 1408 5
(i) As a secondary action when a law enforcement officer detains the
driver of the motor vehicle for a suspected violation of another provision of the Code; or
(ii) When the motor vehicle is parked.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect July 1, 2028, the termination date of Chapter 625 of the Acts of the General Assembly
of 2024, as amended by Chapter 712 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2025. If the
termination date of Chapter 625 is amended, this Act shall take effect on the termination
of Chapter 625. This Act may not be interpreted to have any effect on that termination
provision.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 3 of this Act shall take
effect July 1, 2029, the termination date of Chapter 678 of the Acts of the General Assembly
of 2024. If the termination date of Chapter 678 is amended, this Act shall take effect on the
termination of Chapter 678. This Act may not be interpreted to have any effect on that
termination provision.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Sections 4 and 5 of this Act, this Act shall take effect October 1, 2026.